


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









Investment Management  | BNY Mellon Wealth Management



    Investment Management Exceptional Capabilities; Talented Investment Professionals  Share this page 


   
   Investment Management Spanning all asset classes, our investment approach applies thoughtful market insights to deliver enhanced after-tax, total portfolio returns while minimizing risk. We leverage the vast resources of BNY Mellon's institutional investment organization to provide you unparalleled access to one of the world's largest and best recognized asset managers in a way that best suits your investment needs. 

While our investment capabilities are exceptional, they gain even greater strength when strategically combined within a portfolio. Our strategic asset allocation expertise, overall approach to investment architecture and thoughtful, objective-driven management help to ensure you receive the investment advice and solutions that best serve your goals.     Want to learn more?  Contact us today and we will connect you with an advisor who can tell you more about our Investment Management expertise.  Contact Us      Solutions  Asset AllocationStrategic ArchitectureObjective-Driven InvestingLiquidity ManagementMulti-Asset-Class Strategies Across Global Boutiques    
      Contact Us Want to know more?  Put our expertise to work on your behalf. Submit our short Contact Us form and we'll get in touch with you.       Contact Us 
 












Contact Us | BNY Mellon Wealth Management





      Contact      Get in touch with one of our professionals.   







 





Your Info
Summary





















Wealth Management Inquiries




General Inquiries
To speak with a wealth management professional, call 866-804-5023. 

Client Access or Support
For help accessing Private Workbench, call 866-829-4073. 

Check Verifications
For banking inquiries, call 866-636-0540. 



Office Locations
BNY Mellon Wealth Management works with individuals, families and institutions wherever they are located. View our list of office locations. 
















Other Inquiries





Careers at BNY Mellon


View Job Opportunities



Employee Directory


Contact an Employee



Check Verifications










Family Office Investment Solutions


View Our Capabilities







Planned Giving Programs


View Our Capabilities



Endowments & Foundations


View Our Capabilities








  












Experience | BNY Mellon Wealth Management



     My Experience  I am a  choose one                  I am a    Individual InvestorAdvisor to an IndividualFamily OfficeNon-Profit             and  I'm looking for guidance because            choose one                   I'm looking for guidance because...                   * Please select a    See Results                      Experience A Client-First Culture We do things a little differently at BNY Mellon Wealth Management. Here, we have a commitment to serving clients, not selling products–a client-first approach that has led to industry-leading client satisfaction rates. 

And while we're proud of those results, it’s our client retention rates that matter most to us. Those sustained relationships can only be earned over time–and they’re what allow us to create not just richer lifetimes, but enduring legacies.     
      Becoming an Individual Client      Personal strategies and services based on one question: What do you need?        Experience The Individual Investor Journey At BNY Mellon Wealth Management, expect to receive the best of both worlds: the high-touch, one-on-one service of an investment boutique backed by the power of a large, resource-rich global firm. 

Industry-leading client service. Best in class resources. A spirit of innovation. All focused on you. 

Want to learn more about solutions for Individual Investors? Contact us today, and we’ll connect you with a professional who can help you build a wealth plan specific to your needs. 
              1Discuss2Assess3Plan4Implement5Manage       The Individual Investor Journey Step 1 Discuss Your Goals Working closely, we define your ultimate objectives and expectations for lifestyle and wealth transfer. This ensures everyone is aligned around your collective vision from the start.       The Individual Investor Journey Step 2 Assess Your Portfolio Guided by your goals and risk tolerance, we explore the mix of asset classes that’s right for you. We identify each entity's optimal contribution and consider strategic alignment with your chosen goals.        The Individual Investor Journey Step 3 Plan For What's Next We analyze each entity within your portfolio, including IRAs, trusts and credit facilities, as well as special situations such as business interests or executive compensation. Our plan is created with your input throughout, and moves to implementation only with your approval.       The Individual Investor Journey Step 4 Implement Strategic Action We document your plan's details and review with you, aligning them with your requirements before implementing the strategy.       The Individual Investor Journey Step 5 Actively Manage Unlike other firms, your portfolio is managed actively by a team of people. They are regularly revisiting your goals, rebalancing your positions, and identifying new opportunities. They have your interests top of mind, all the time.        Discover Our Services for Individuals & Families  Learn More 
      Becoming an Institutional Client      We understand what makes institutional wealth management unique. And we know how to optimize it.            Experience The Institutional Investor Journey No single firm offers family offices and non-profits integrated support like BNY Mellon Wealth Management. Industry-leading custody capabilities and deep fiduciary knowledge make our in-house expertise for institutions unparalleled. And our centuries of investment excellence across asset classes and styles informs everything we do.


Want to learn more about our solutions for Institutions? Get the answers you need to discover what BNY Mellon Wealth Management can do for your organization.          1Discuss2Assess3Plan4Implement5Manage       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 1 Discuss Your Goals Even before you’ve committed to being a client, you will meet your core team of advisors. Together, you will outline your organization’s needs and goals.       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 2 Assess Your Portfolio With your organization’s goals in mind, the team will work look closely at what currently exists. This work is aimed at uncovering under-leveraged assets, missed opportunities and unnecessary risks relative to your organization’s future needs.       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 3 Plan For What's Next Your dedicated client services team works with you to outline near-term and long-term strategic goals. Timeframes and milestones are established along with the communication plan.       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 4 Implement Strategic Action The team goes to work executing the agreed upon strategy, keeping you informed every step of the way. Reports are made available for you to review and share.       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 5 Actively Manage Your team is regularly revisiting your organization’s goals and actively identifying new opportunities or risks. We are also constantly consulting with our internal experts, sharing best thinking and getting ahead of trends.        Discover Our Services for Institutions  Learn More 
      Private Workbench      Take a tour of our online platform for real-time account information, research and reports        Private Workbench Benefits    Mobile Access Available on your phone, tablet, or laptop, so you can monitor your investments and banking in real time.   Custom Settings Make the experience yours by seeing only what you want and nothing that you don’t.   Direct Access to Your Dedicated Team The My Team tab gives you direct email access to your wealth management team.     
      Contact Us How can we help you?  Your questions are important to us, complete our contact form and we’ll connect you with the right team member to discuss your needs.      Contact Us 
 












Discover  | BNY Mellon Wealth Management



        Discover How we successfully manage wealth and the types of clients we serve.     
      Who We Serve      Customized plans and services for individuals, families, advisors and institutions   



Individuals & Families
We specialize in meeting the complex investment and banking needs of wealthy individuals and their families.
Learn More



Advisors to Individuals & Families
We offer a collaborative approach and customized solutions for our clients' other professional and financial advisors.
Learn More



Family Offices
Among the first of its kind in the nation, our Family Office services feature industry-leading resources and expertise for family offices and their financial interests.
Learn More



Non-Profits
We offer a full range of investment, custody, and reporting services tailored specifically to the needs of non-profits nationwide.
Learn More



      Capabilities      Deep expertise across a wide range of wealth management services           Asset Servicing & Information Management       Asset Servicing & Information Management  As the world’s largest asset servicing provider, we make sure that your assets and information are secure through our full range of custody, administration, and reporting services.  Learn more         Credit & Lending Services       Credit & Lending Services  As the oldest U.S. private bank, we have extensive experience in credit and lending–and in the strategies that make them effective components of your wealth plan.  Learn more         Donor Advised Funds       Donor Advised Funds  We have a distinct team dedicated to the needs of donor advised fund sponsor organizations and individual donors.  Learn more         Endowment & Foundation Services       Endowment & Foundation Services  We have an experienced team dedicated exclusively to the needs of Endowments and Foundations.  Learn more         Escrow Services       Escrow Services  Escrow arrangements offer a perfect solution when you and another party require property such as cash, securities, real estate or insurance policies, to be held by a third party until certain conditions are met.  Learn more         Family Office Investment Solutions       Family Office Investment Solutions  The Family Office investment platform focuses on delivery of custom solutions constructed around each client’s unique liquidity, cash flow, tax, risk and return requirements.  Learn more         Fiduciary Services       Fiduciary Services  One of the largest banks in the world and the creator of the nation’s first trust, we are unrivaled in fiduciary experience.  Learn more         Investment Management       Investment Management  Our investment management services are dedicated exclusively to the needs of private clients.  Learn more         Jumbo Mortgages       Jumbo Mortgages  As a jumbo mortgage lender of primary and vacation homes nationwide, we have unrivaled expertise in creating and managing solutions to meet the needs of our private clients.  Learn more         Philanthropy       Philanthropy  With BNY Mellon, your charitable gifts not only serve recipients well, but also remained aligned with your strategic, philanthropic and financial goals.  Learn more         Planned Giving Services       Planned Giving Services  For more than 20 years, we have served non-profit organizations with comprehensive gift management services, tailored investment management solutions, and donor and organizational support.  Learn more         Private Banking       Private Banking  From checking, savings and online banking to sophisticated financing strategies, we respond to the evolving needs of our clients with customized solutions and personalized service.  Learn more         Self-Directed Investment Services       Self-Directed Investment Services  Our Cash Management Access Account (CMAA) combines our banking capabilities with our brokerage services in one streamlined solution.   Learn more         Wealth & Estate Planning       Wealth & Estate Planning  When you’ve been serving wealthy clients for more than two centuries, there are few wealth challenges you haven’t seen – or solved.   Learn more       
      Contact Us Want to know more about BNY Mellon Wealth Management?  Fill in the quick contact form and we’ll connect you with the right person to discuss your needs.      Contact Us 
 












Wealth & Estate Planning | BNY Mellon Wealth Management



    Wealth & Estate Planning Deep Expertise; Proactive Counsel


  Share this page 


   
   Wealth & Estate Planning When you’ve been serving wealthy clients for more than two centuries, there are few wealth challenges you haven’t seen – or solved. We can help you fully realize your and your family’s specific goals and vision by coordinating the right strategy, resources and support. As external influences or personal circumstances change, effective wealth planning is consistently sustained through diligent management, the highest fiduciary standards of service, and proactive counsel. 

Equally important, we share our technical knowledge and deep experience with your other advisors, thoughtfully and collaboratively applying our resources to further your goals and ensuring a comprehensive wealth management plan.
     Want to learn more?  Contact us today and we will connect you with an expert advisor who can tell you more about our Wealth & Estate Planning services.  Contact Us      Solutions  Wealth Protection & TransferTax PlanningConcentrated Wealth SolutionsInsurance & Risk Management SolutionsEstate Settlement & AdministrationFamily Governance    
      Contact Us Want to Know More?  Discover how our products and services can help you. Complete the contact form and we’ll connect you with one of our experts.      Contact Us 
 
























Institutional home



















































Vanguard - DC Small/Mid Services: Our approach                                     
        



























































Your input was invalid





























Defined ContributionSmall/Mid plans (startup to $20M+)








 Our approach 
 Sponsor support 
 Participant experience 
 Plan administration 
 Advisor and TPA support 
 Plan Advisor Resource Center








Select Our approachAll  

Sponsor supportAll  

Participant experienceAll  

Plan administrationAll  

Advisor and TPA supportAll  

Plan Advisor Resource CenterAll  










Our approach

Leaders of small and mid-sized businesses have multiple roles and competing priorities. You want a best-in-class retirement plan but may be unsure about all the complexities and requirements. You may be uncertain about the costs and fees involved. You need a provider focused solely on retirement and aligned with your needs and goals—and fully committed to you, your participants, and the ongoing improvement of retirement investing.

Vanguard is committed to the retirement business and is a leader in the retirement plan industry. Best of all, you can benefit from Vanguard's unique ownership structure: We're owned by our clients and not by outside investors or stockholders. That means you never need to question whose interests come first for us. This approach serves as a foundation for all that we do with Vanguard Retirement Plan Access™, our 401(k) offer for small and mid-sized plans. You can count on our expertise to remove the uncertainties from managing your plan and our leadership to help you offer a strong plan for your participants. 



Key benefits




You can:

Have confidence in your plan.
Understand your costs.
Focus on your business.





Cost-conscious?
As a business owner and plan fiduciary, you want to eliminate ambiguity in retirement plan costs. Research has shown that plan costs for the smaller end of the market tend to be higher, and you need a retirement plan provider that not only provides transparent pricing but has a fair and reasonable cost structure.1
With Vanguard Retirement Plan Access:

You receive an All-in Fee Report that shows the total cost of your plan.
You have access to low-cost Vanguard index funds, plus the opportunity to choose from among more than 12,000 non-Vanguard funds.
Your annual recordkeeping price is based on a per-participant fee—a fee that doesn't jump as your assets grow, as with many small to mid-sized retirement plans.
You have flexibility in how you cover your plan costs—including a recordkeeping credit depending on the share class selected.




Too busy?
 As a business owner, you're pressed for time and focused on many aspects of business. With Vanguard Retirement Plan Access, you can rely on high-quality recordkeeping and administration to ease your administrative burden and help your employees stay on track for retirement.


1 Source: Investment Company Institute, 2014. 

















Contact us
  888-684-401K
  Email






Plan Advisor Resource Center



Working with your partners
 We can work with your advisor and third-party administrator to create a state-of-the-art plan.

Request information (RFI)Vanguard Retirement Plan Access™
Vanguard: Taking a stand for your participants
Infographic: Small biz saves smart
















Plan Advisor Resource Center



Working with your partners
            We can work with your advisor and third-party administrator to create a state-of-the-art plan.


Request information (RFI)Vanguard Retirement Plan Access™
Vanguard: Taking a stand for your participants
Infographic: Small biz saves smart































































Vanguard - Target-date strategies                                     
        


























































Your input was invalid






























Enduring. Holistic.Defendable. Vanguard Target Retirement Funds










 



Not all target-date funds are created equal.™ 






Our infographic can help you evaluate your target-date fund (TDF) strategy. It includes three steps that focus on TDF costs, stability, and investor focus.                                 Learn more.






















Target-date strategies
Selecting a target-date fund (TDF) series for your qualified default investment alternative can be a critical step in designing a defined contribution (DC) retirement plan that can stand up to the scrutiny from many quarters, including regulators.

Vanguard Target Retirement Funds offer a sophisticated design and a clear, straightforward glide path that's a natural fit for autoenrollment and default investment programs—a TDF strategy that can help lower your fiduciary risk and help improve the odds of your plan participants achieving their retirement goals.



Fiduciaries value not only the sophisticated methodology behind the Vanguard Target Retirement portfolio, but also the clarity of the glide path, index implementation, and high degree of transparency.
John Croke
Target Retirement Fund Product Manager










Enduring investment solution
With Vanguard, you'll have a target-date retirement solution that is implemented with a well-diversified set of market-cap-weighted index funds. The embedded diversification of this approach provides balance against the markets‘ natural ups and downs.





Reaching goals through a holistic approach
Vanguard's target-date funds are designed by investment, plan design, and participant behavior experts. This integrated approach puts participants at the heart of your target-date offering so you can have confidence that your target-date offering can help your participants reach their retirement goals.





Defendable performance year after year
The combination of consistent, prudent product oversight and our history of reducing costs help you deliver defensible performance to investment committees and plan participants year after year.


Sophisticated portfolio construction
The Target Retirement Funds are designed by Vanguard's respected investment managers and asset allocation experts and are grounded in ongoing, cross-disciplinary research. The glide path reflects a long-term, holistic view of retirement investing.



MORE ABOUT TARGET-DATE STRATEGIES
Research & commentary

* Vanguard Target Retirement Funds offer the simplicity of an index-oriented, well-diversified portfolio that is strategic and straightforward in its approach. The funds are composed of five underlying index funds and follow an easy-to-understand asset allocation glide path. Underlying this simplicity is Vanguard's deep investment expertise, knowledge of the capital markets, and insights into participant behavior.
Investments in Target Retirement Funds are subject to the risks of their underlying funds. The year in the fund name refers to the approximate year (the target date) when an investor in the fund would retire and leave the workforce. The fund will gradually shift its emphasis from more aggressive investments (stocks) to more conservative ones (bonds and short-term reserves) based on its
                   target date. An investment in a Target Retirement Fund is not guaranteed at any time, including on or after the target date.
              
All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest.
Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss.
There is no guarantee that any particular asset allocation or mix of funds will meet your investment objectives or provide you with a given level of income.
















Contact us


  800-523-1036

OUR TARGET-DATE LINEUP
Vanguard Target Retirement Funds


























































Vanguard - Nonprofit services: Advisory services                                     
        



























































Your input was invalid





























Nonprofit








 Understanding your needs 
 Advisory services 
 Your Vanguard team 
 Nonprofit resource center








Select Understanding your needsAll  

Advisory servicesAll  

Your Vanguard teamAll  

Nonprofit resource centerAll  










Advisory services
Many organizations like yours find it challenging to oversee their portfolio while also managing the day-to-day responsibilities of running their endowment, foundation, or charitable organization. But partnering with a provider who understands your needs can help you better balance these competing priorities.
Partnering with your organization
Vanguard Institutional Advisory Services® (VIAS) offers nonprofits the considerable resources of a large investment firm like Vanguard with the customized service of a specialized boutique. When your organization partners with VIAS, you work with a team of investment professionals that has your objectives and fiduciary responsibilities in mind. VIAS strives to:

Understand your organization's mission, spending needs, and unique situation and offer sophisticated, unbiased advice.
Develop a low-cost portfolio customized to your organization's needs.
Relieve your staff of many of the day-to-day burdens of investment program management.

OCIO: One service, many names


One approach nonprofits are increasingly considering is an outsourced chief investment officer (OCIO). An OCIO service—which is a key offering of Vanguard Institutional Advisory Services—acts as an extension of the board and investment staff. The OCIO determines an asset allocation strategy, selects investment advisors to implement it, and manages its operation and execution. Investment providers and clients call this service a variety of names, including discretionary management, advisory services, and investment management.





Investing and advising
Optimizing your portfolio to meet your long-term investment objectives requires time and skill. VIAS helps you develop a tailored portfolio that ensures your investments are diversified, risk-appropriate, and aligned with your overall strategy.
Our comprehensive advisory services include:









Portfolio construction 

Asset allocation analysis that uses a distinct, proprietary model to deliver solutions based on your portfolio needs.
Investment policy consulting designed to meet the unique investment goals of your organization.
Customized product selection that focuses on low-cost index and active investments.











Portfolio management

Performance reporting to help keep your investment committee informed.
Investment reviews that provide insights into your portfolio and the broader market and economic environment.
Steadfast commitment to risk management and process excellence through ongoing portfolio monitoring and rebalancing.








Research & expertise

Investment expertise and commentary on financial issues that provide context for your decision-making.
Investment committee best practices that are designed to increase your group's effectiveness.





Notes:

Advice services offered through Vanguard Institutional Advisory Services are provided by Vanguard Advisers, Inc., a registered investment advisor.
All investments are subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest. 
Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss in a declining market. 

















Contact us
  888-888-7064
  Email







Nonprofit Resource Center

Fiduciary roles & lawsMission & planningInvestment strategy
Governance best practices
Fiduciary toolkit

LEARN HOW WE SUPPORT
Defined contribution plans

Defined benefit plans

Consultants
Request information (RFI) 











Contact us
  888-888-7064
  E-mail







Nonprofit Resource Center

Fiduciary roles & lawsMission & planningInvestment strategy
Governance best practices
Fiduciary toolkit

LEARN HOW WE SUPPORT
Defined contribution plans

Defined benefit plans

Consultants
Request information (RFI) 






























































Vanguard - Partnering with you                                     
        


























































Your input was invalid





























ConsultantsHelping you help your clients








 Partnering with you 
 Resources for you








Select Partnering with youAll  

Resources for youAll  












Partnering with you

Consultants are a key source of guidance and information for retirement plan sponsors—both during the search for an investment manager or provider and after the selection. Because we share many of the same clients and have similar responsibilities, Vanguard values a strong partnership with you in serving plan sponsors and institutional investors.




Among all plan sponsor markets,Vanguard is ranked
#1 in value for cost.
                            2014 Boston Research Group Plan Sponsor Study¹




 



Your main point of contact is a relationship manager, who leads a team of professionals dedicated to serving the needs of your clients. This includes access to our extensive resources in portfolio construction, investment management, research, fiduciary and compliance matters, and data analysis.



 

 


¹Boston Research Group (BRG) is a strategic market research and consulting firm that serves a number of industries, including the financial services industry. The BRG survey was a syndicated study conducted independently by BRG. Vanguard neither commissioned nor paid to be included in it. BRG has conducted unrelated, custom market research for Vanguard in the past.


















Contact us
  800-523-1036
LEARN HOW WE SUPPORT
Defined contribution plansDefined benefit plansNonprofit organizations














Contact us
  800-523-1036
LEARN HOW WE SUPPORT
Defined contribution plansDefined benefit plansNonprofit organizations









































Martin Investment Management, LLC: An investment adviser















 Call us (847) 424-9124

 


















Martin Investment Management, LLC: An investment adviser









 Call us (847) 424-9124

 


OUR STRATEGIES


Growth With A Value Discipline
Global Eco-Investing
Tortue Capital
Martin Global Investing




Martin Global Investing
Martin Global Investing combines Martin Investment Management, LLC's strategies of “Best Ideas” and Tortue Capital™ to create a portfolio of 50 to 60 large capitalization equities of the U.S. and international developed markets. This strategy follows the similar investment philosophy and process of the firm's other strategies focusing on buying quality companies at reasonable valuations and holding the investment over a long term investment horizon. Martin Global Investing seeks to invest in companies with consistent growth, strong fundamentals, low leverage, and high trading liquidity. This strategy is actively managed. Although the strategy limits position size to five per cent of the portfolio, the strategy can be customized to reflect all market sectors and higher position limits.
 






Martin Investment Management, LLC: An investment adviser









 Call us (847) 424-9124

 


Services


Our Services
Our Clients




Our Clients



Endowments & Foundations


Pension & Profit Sharing Plans


Individuals & Families


Trusts, Estates, & Charitable Organizations


Corporations & Partnerships



 






Martin Investment Management, LLC: An investment adviser









 Call us (847) 424-9124

 


RECOGNITIONS
Martin Investment Management, LLC welcomes you to review the firm's recent recognitions by clicking on the buttons below. Each link will take you to the recognizing organization's description of the recognition, their process of selection and other relevant disclosure which may help you in assessing the value of the recognitions.
PSN "Top Guns" Recognitions
            
 


"Top Guns Manager of the Decade" for the Long Term Growth Composite in the Large Growth Universe category, which consisted of 227 firms and 319 products, for 5 consecutive periods (10 years ending December 31, 2015, December 31, 2014, December 31, 2013, December 31, 2012, and December 31, 2011).


 
      
 


Tortue Capital™ received 5 Stars designations in the EAFE Universe for the period ending December 31, 2014 and Bull/Bear designations in the EAFE Universe for two consecutive years, for the periods ending December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012. This places Tortue Capital™ in the top ten performers in its category, ranking 8th out of a total of 165 firms and 272 products/strategies.


 
       
 


Global Eco Investing received a Bull & Bear Master designation in the Global Equity Universe for the three year period ending December 31, 2015 and a 5 Stars designation in the PSN Global Equity Universe for the period ending December 31, 2014. This places Eco Investing in the top ten performers in its category, ranking 6th out of a total of 327 firms and 616 products/strategies.


 
Lipper MarketPlace "Best Money Managers" Recognitions
Lipper, a Thomson Reuters company, is a global leader in supplying mutual fund and separately managed account information, analytical tools, and commentary. According to Lipper, it's benchmarking and classifications are widely recognized as the industry standard by asset managers, fund companies, and financial intermediaries.
            
Lipper MarketPlace ranked Martin Investment Management, LLC for US Large-Cap Growth & Value Equity strategy, International Equity strategy, and US Large Cap Equity strategy as Top Performers in the following categories:


"Top 20 Money Manager" for US Large-Cap Growth & Value Equity in 2015, 2014, 2013, and 2012, and International Equity in 2015.
"Top 40 Money Manager" for US Large-Cap Growth & Value Equity in 2015, 2014, 2013, and 2012; for International Equity in 2015, 2015, 2014, 2013, and 2012; and for US Large-Cap Equity in 2015 and 2014.


The ratings listed above are believed to be generally relevant to investment consultants, plan sponsors, existing clients, potential clients, and others in performing manager selection and on-going performance reviews. These ratings are only one of many factors that maybe relevant in determining whether to retain a portfolio manager.
Please note that past performance is not indicative of future results. The ratings listed above may not be representative of any one client's experience because these ratings may reflect an average or sample of the firm's accounts or composites of accounts. None of the publications listed above are affiliated with the firm, and the firm has not made any payment for or in anticipation of any rating. From time to time, the firm has, and the firm expects to continue, to purchase reprints and/or other publishing permission from certain of the publications that have recognized the firm's performance, including Informa Investment Solutions, Inc., the publisher of PSN awards. Since January 1, 2010, the firm has paid Informa Investment Solutions, Inc. the following amounts: $2,000 in 2012, $2,000 in 2013, $2,000 in 2014, $3,000 in 2015, and $2,000 in 2016 (through February 28, 2016). The above ratings are not based on client evaluations of the firm. We encourage you to contact the recognizing organizations if you would like additional information regarding their process or methodology. Please contact the firm should you have any further questions on our purchases of reprints or other publishing permission.
 






Martin Investment Management, LLC: An investment adviser









 Call us (847) 424-9124

 


Perspective


Current Commentary
Previous Commentaries
Relevant Academic Studies




Relevant Academic Studies


Baker, Malcolm, Brendan Bradley, Jeffrey Wurgler. “Benchmarks as Limits to Arbitrage: Understanding the Low Volatility Anomaly.” Financial Analysts Journal, Vol. 67: January/February 2011.
Barber, Brad M. and Terrance Odean. “All That Glitters: The Effect of Attention and News on the Buying Behavior of Individual and Institutional Investors.” Oxford University Press. December 2007.
Barber, Brad, Terrance Odean, and Lu Zheng. “Out of Sight, Out of Mind: The Effects of Expenses on Mutual Fund Flows.” Journal of Business. (To be published), paper dated December 2003.
Brown, James R., and Petersen, Bruce C. “Financing Innovation and Growth: Cash Flow, External Equity, and the 1990s R&D Boom.” Journal of Finance. February 2009.
Connor, Gregory, Lisa Goldberg, and Robert Korajczyk. Portfolio Risk Forecasting. Princeton University Press, 2008 (to be published).
Cremers, Martijn, and Antti Petajisto. “How Active is Your Fund Manager? A New Measure That Predicts Performance.” AFA 2007, January 15, 2007.
Da, Zhi. “Cash Flow, Consumption Risk, and the Cross-section of Stock Returns.” Journal of Finance. April 2009.
Dumas, Bernard, Kurshev, Alexander, and Uppal, Raman. “Equilibrium Portfolio Strategies in the Presence of Sentiment Risk and Excess Volatility.” Journal of Finance. April 2009.
French, Ken. Interview by Bob Hansen. “Professor Ken French on the cross-section of expected returns.” Tuck Today. Amos Tuck School of Business. Winter 2004.
Greenwald, Bruce C. N., Judd Kahn, Paul D. Sonkin, and Michael van Biema. Value Investing: From Graham to Buffett and Beyond. John Wiley & Sons, 2004.
Haugen, Robert A., and Nardin L. Baker. “Commonality In The Determinants Of Expected Stock Returns.” Journal of Financial Economics. Summer 1996.
Ikenberry, David, Richard Shockley, and Kent L. Womack. “Why Active Fund Managers Often Underperform the S&P 500: The Impact of Size and Skewness,” The Journal of Private Portfolio Management, Spring 1992, Vol. 1.
O'Shaughnessy, James P. What Works on Wall Street: A Guide to the Best-Performing Investment Strategies of All Time. McGraw-Hill, 2005.
Petajisto, Antti. “Active Share and Mutual Fund Performance.” Financial Analysts Journal, Vol. 69, Number 4: July/August 2013.
Shiller, Robert J. Irrational Exuberance, 2nd ed. Princeton University Press, 2005.
Siegel, Jeremy J. The Future for Investors: Why the Tried and the True Triumph Over the Bold and the New. Crown Business, 2005.
Siegel, Jeremy J. Stocks for the Long Run: The Definitive Guide to Financial Market Returns and Long-Term Investment Strategies, 4th ed. McGraw-Hill, 2008.
Womack, Kent L. “Do Brokerage Analysts' Recommendations have Investment Value?” The Journal of Finance, Vol. 54, March 1996.


 






Martin Investment Management, LLC: An investment adviser









 Call us (847) 424-9124

 


RECOGNITIONS
Martin Investment Management, LLC welcomes you to review the firm's recent recognitions by clicking on the buttons below. Each link will take you to the recognizing organization's description of the recognition, their process of selection and other relevant disclosure which may help you in assessing the value of the recognitions.
PSN "Top Guns" Recognitions
            
 


"Top Guns Manager of the Decade" for the Long Term Growth Composite in the Large Growth Universe category, which consisted of 227 firms and 319 products, for 5 consecutive periods (10 years ending December 31, 2015, December 31, 2014, December 31, 2013, December 31, 2012, and December 31, 2011).


 
      
 


Tortue Capital™ received 5 Stars designations in the EAFE Universe for the period ending December 31, 2014 and Bull/Bear designations in the EAFE Universe for two consecutive years, for the periods ending December 31, 2013 and December 31, 2012. This places Tortue Capital™ in the top ten performers in its category, ranking 8th out of a total of 165 firms and 272 products/strategies.


 
       
 


Global Eco Investing received a Bull & Bear Master designation in the Global Equity Universe for the three year period ending December 31, 2015 and a 5 Stars designation in the PSN Global Equity Universe for the period ending December 31, 2014. This places Eco Investing in the top ten performers in its category, ranking 6th out of a total of 327 firms and 616 products/strategies.


 
Lipper MarketPlace "Best Money Managers" Recognitions
Lipper, a Thomson Reuters company, is a global leader in supplying mutual fund and separately managed account information, analytical tools, and commentary. According to Lipper, it's benchmarking and classifications are widely recognized as the industry standard by asset managers, fund companies, and financial intermediaries.
            
Lipper MarketPlace ranked Martin Investment Management, LLC for US Large-Cap Growth & Value Equity strategy, International Equity strategy, and US Large Cap Equity strategy as Top Performers in the following categories:


"Top 20 Money Manager" for US Large-Cap Growth & Value Equity in 2015, 2014, 2013, and 2012, and International Equity in 2015.
"Top 40 Money Manager" for US Large-Cap Growth & Value Equity in 2015, 2014, 2013, and 2012; for International Equity in 2015, 2015, 2014, 2013, and 2012; and for US Large-Cap Equity in 2015 and 2014.


The ratings listed above are believed to be generally relevant to investment consultants, plan sponsors, existing clients, potential clients, and others in performing manager selection and on-going performance reviews. These ratings are only one of many factors that maybe relevant in determining whether to retain a portfolio manager.
Please note that past performance is not indicative of future results. The ratings listed above may not be representative of any one client's experience because these ratings may reflect an average or sample of the firm's accounts or composites of accounts. None of the publications listed above are affiliated with the firm, and the firm has not made any payment for or in anticipation of any rating. From time to time, the firm has, and the firm expects to continue, to purchase reprints and/or other publishing permission from certain of the publications that have recognized the firm's performance, including Informa Investment Solutions, Inc., the publisher of PSN awards. Since January 1, 2010, the firm has paid Informa Investment Solutions, Inc. the following amounts: $2,000 in 2012, $2,000 in 2013, $2,000 in 2014, $3,000 in 2015, and $2,000 in 2016 (through February 28, 2016). The above ratings are not based on client evaluations of the firm. We encourage you to contact the recognizing organizations if you would like additional information regarding their process or methodology. Please contact the firm should you have any further questions on our purchases of reprints or other publishing permission.
 




需要安全验证





Facebook加入或登录 Facebook   邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？登录想加入 Facebook 吗？注册注册安全验证码请输入以下文本看不清楚上面的文字？换一个或播放语音验证信息框中文字：这是什么？安全验证这是一个标准的安全测试，用于阻止垃圾邮件制造者创建假帐户并向用户发送垃圾信息。提交中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017







Martin Investment Management LLC






























































Research Hub




Sign In











Sign In


New Account



About Macroaxis


Settings


Plans & Pricing



 Toggle Menu


 Toggle Fullscreen







   Markets




Equities




Portfolios




Stories






×











 My Equities
Investing Ideas

Free Tools

World Markets Map
Cryptocurrency Center
Equity Research
Company Directory
Insider Directory
Buy or Sell Recommendation
Pair Correlation
Stocks Correlation
Pattern Recognition
Watchlist Analysis



 Services

Technology Overview
Solution Methodology
Acknowledgement
Product Tour
FAQs



 About Us

About Macroaxis
Contact Us
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
Advertising



Sign In   DOW   21,730  1.01%Saowalak ThithaphanKorsak ChairasamisakSuchada Itthicharukun






World
US















Martin Investment Management  LLC

  
		


 
		




Companies in United States
Insiders
Advisers
Ideas
Correlations
Volatility
News
Funds
ETFs
Crypto










	Upgrade to remove ads 





User TypeAdvisorEntity NameMartin Investment Management  LLCSEC Registration # Minimum Invetsment Required0.0Assets Under Managment$ 68.4 M Contact Details LocationEvanston, IllinoisAddress Postal Code CountryUnited StatesPhone Fax Web Sitehttp://www.martin-investments.com




Sign In
	
				 to check out Martin-Investment-Management-LLC and other financial advisors in the area. 							
		
				 As a registered user you will also get following benefit from Macroaxis membership: 							
					
				





							
								 Best Portfolio Management and Performance Monitoring Solution on Internet.
								









								 Easy to use Portfolio Optimization Tools which money managers have used for years.
								









								 Know your risk and identify high risk, low return stocks in your portfolio.
								







Get Started With Macroaxis




You May Also Consider Name Location  Net Rating  Greenlight Fee Only Advisors  LLC Evanston IL 0 Martin Investment Management  LLC Evanston IL 0 Magnetar Investment Management  LLC Evanston IL 0 Betterman Investment Group  LLC Evanston IL 0 Evanston Capital Management  LLC Evanston IL 0 William Blair New World Ventures LL Evanston IL 0 Magnetar Financial LLC Evanston IL 0 Shankervalleau Investment Advisors  Evanston IL 0 Total Portfolio Management  LLC Evanston IL 0 Breen Financial Corporation Evanston IL 0


Financial advisors use their knowledge of investments, 
tax laws, and insurance to recommend financial options to individuals.
The SEC typically regulates investment advisers that have assets under management in excess of $25,000,000. Investment advisers that do not meet this threshold generally are regulated by the states. The SEC registers IA firms but does not separately register individual representatives of IA firms. The states register IA firms, and many separately register individual investment adviser representatives.

Currently, you can only search for IA firms on this website. In the future, this website also will provide the ability to search for individual investment adviser representatives.

In 1996 Congress amended the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 to require that the SEC establish a readily accessible electronic process to respond to public inquiries about investment advisers and their disciplinary information. The SEC created this website to satisfy Congress? mandate. 


		Refer to the following references to for additional information before selecting your Financial Advisor
			
IARD    Investment Adviser Registration Depository
Investment Adviser Search    Search for an Investment Adviser Firm
U.S. Department of Labor: Financial Advisors    Bureau of Labor Statistics: Financial Advisors
FINRA    Financial Industry Regulatory Authority
AAFM    American Academy of Financial Management
CFP    Certified Financial Planner Board of Standards
FPA    Financial Planning Association









OpportunitiesExplore Investment OpportunitiesBuild portfolios using Macroaxis predefined set of investing ideas. Many of Macroaxis investing ideas can easily outperform a given market. Ideas can also be optimized per your risk profile before portfolio origination is invoked. Explore Investing Ideas  Fix All your PortfoliosBy capturing your risk tolerance and investment horizon Macroaxis technology of instant portfolio optimization will compute exactly how much risk is acceptable for your desired return expectationsFix your portfolios for free








Updating Transaction...
	






	Report was successfully generated
	



































































































			© 2017 Macroaxis LLC All rights reserved  
		








Insiders
Companies
Contact Us
Feedback
Widgets








































需要安全验证




Facebook加入或登录 Facebook   邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？登录想加入 Facebook 吗？注册注册安全验证码请输入以下文本看不清楚上面的文字？换一个或播放语音验证信息框中文字：这是什么？安全验证这是一个标准的安全测试，用于阻止垃圾邮件制造者创建假帐户并向用户发送垃圾信息。提交中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017




 



Company Profile for Martin Investment Management, LLC | Business Wire
























































      Company Profile for Martin Investment Management, LLC
    





March 18, 2016 10:40 AM Eastern Daylight Time



--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Martin Investment Management, LLC is an equity oriented, majority 
      female-owned registered investment adviser located in Evanston, 
      Illinois. The firm focuses on three primary “Best Ideas” investment 
      strategies. The Growth with a Value Discipline strategy invests 
      primarily in U.S. large cap equities. The global Eco-Investing strategy 
      focuses on companies that have goals of engaging in best environmental 
      practices and good stewardship. The Tortue CapitalTM strategy invests in 
      a range of non-U.S. large cap companies in the developed world that have 
      global exposure through their products or services.
    




Company:



           
        

           
        


            Martin Investment Management, LLC
          










           
        




Headquarters Address:







          1560 Sherman Avenue
        









          Suite 1250
        









          Evanston, IL 60201
        









           
        




Main Telephone:







          847 424-9124
        









           
        




Website:








www.martin-investments.com











           
        




Type of Organization:







          Private
        









           
        




Industry:







          Finance
        









           
        




Key Executives:







          Managing Director: Sandra Martin
        









          Managing Director: Patrick Martin
        









          Managing Director: Mary Ellen Zellerbach
        









           
        




Managing Director












Contact:







          Sandra Martin
        




Phone:







          847 424-9124
        




Email:








s.s.martin@martin-investments.com











           
        




Managing Director












Contact:







          Patrick Martin
        




Phone:







          847 424-9124
        




Email:








p.a.martin@martin-investments.com











           
        




Managing Director












Contact:







          Mary Ellen Zellerbach
        




Phone:







          847 424-9124
        




Email:








c.m.zellerbach@martin-investments.com











           
        



















Social Media Profiles

Martin Investment Management LLC









 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up












Martin Investment Management, LLC’s Investment Strategies Offered on HedgeCoVest PlatformHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets close in 4 hrs 52 minsS&P 5002,478.89+1.76 (+0.07%)Dow 3021,721.81+108.38 (+0.50%)Nasdaq6,422.20+10.03 (+0.16%)Stocks to WatchFord falls despite beat, AMD eyes fresh high, Scripps takeover talk ramps upMartin Investment Management, LLC’s Investment Strategies Offered on HedgeCoVest PlatformBusiness WireFebruary 13, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareEVANSTON, Ill.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Martin Investment Management, LLC, a Registered Investment Adviser, has teamed up with HedgeCoVest LLC to add two new institutional-level strategies to the HedgeCoVest Managed Accounts Platform and the SMArt Xchange (‘SMArtX’), a unified managed accounts platform available exclusively to SS&C Advent clients. The relationship with HedgeCoVest will offer access to Martin Investment Management, LLC’s 'Best Ideas' Growth With A Value Discipline strategy and its Tortue Capital™ - International Equity Developed World strategy for wealth advisors utilizing the HedgeCoVest and SMArtX platforms.“I look forward to our new relationship with HedgeCoVest and am very excited that two of our established 'Best Ideas' strategies, 'Best Ideas' Growth With A Value Discipline and Tortue Capital™ - International Equity Developed World, will be available to a broader audience of investors,” commented Patrick A. Martin.Utilizing its proprietary trading technology, HedgeCoVest allows clients to allocate in real-time to Martin Investment Management, LLC’s strategies in a separately managed brokerage account. HedgeCoVest offers advisors real-time performance reporting and intra-day liquidity for both traditional and alternative strategies, while taking advantage of the security and transparency of a managed account. Two of Martin Investment Management, LLC’s strategies are now available through HedgeCoVest and its white-labeled SMArtX platform, including the 'Best Ideas' Growth With A Value Discipline and the Tortue Capital™ - International Equity Developed World strategies.“We are excited to expand the selection of investment strategies available to advisors, while remaining consistent with our approach of delivering high levels of liquidity, transparency, and security in the investment process,” said Evan Rapoport, CEO of HedgeCoVest. “Our vision and commitment to the highest industry standards are shared by Martin Investment Management, LLC and we look forward to working with them to provide advisors with exposure to very focused mid to large capitalization domestic ('Best Ideas' Growth With A Value Discipline) and international (Tortue Capital™ - International Equity Developed World) equities of about 25 to 30 holdings in each portfolio with a long-term investment horizon, low portfolio turnover, and using the power of compounding.”Investing for the long term with focus and patience, Martin Investment Management, LLC’s inclusion on the HedgeCoVest platform positions the firm to continue on its recent path of significant growth. Martin Investment Management LLC’s assets under management and administration have experienced nearly a ten-fold increase over the past seven years to over $800 million.About Martin Investment Management, LLC© 2017 Martin Investment Management, LLC (“MIM”) is an equity oriented, majority female-owned Registered Investment Adviser located in Evanston, Illinois. The firm focuses on three primary “Best Ideas” investment strategies. The Growth with a Value Discipline strategy invests primarily in U.S. large cap equities. The global Eco-Investing strategy focuses on companies that have goals of engaging in best environmental practices and good stewardship. The Tortue CapitalTM strategy invests in a range of non-U.S. large cap companies in the developed world that have global exposure through their products or services.It should be noted that rankings and past performance are not indicative of future performance.About HedgeCoVest LLCHedgeCoVest is the creator of an award-winning, real-time investment platform that revolutionizes the managed-accounts industry. HedgeCoVest’s proprietary trading technology empowers wealth advisors with traditional and alternative institutional investment management in unified managed accounts, while providing liquidity, transparency, security, and flat fees.About the SMArt XchangeThe SMArt Xchange (“SMArtX”) is a next generation unified managed accounts platform open exclusively to clients of SS&C Advent. SMArtX combines HedgeCoVest’s proprietary trading and managed accounts technology with SS&C Advent’s powerful suite of tools for wealth advisors.View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20170213005777/en/ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextSTOCKS RISE: Here's what you need to knowBusiness InsiderA Penny-Crypto Miracle Making Some Americans RichAgora FinancialSponsoredPhil Mickelson trash-talked Jordan Spieth at the Open Championship — and Phil is going to have to eat his wordsBusiness InsiderFord falls despite beat, AMD eyes fresh high, Scripps takeover talk ramps upYahoo FinanceHere's Trump's approval rating in every stateBusiness InsiderEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredCoca-Cola earnings beat the street but investors aren't too jazzedYahoo Finance Video7 questions to ask when choosing a financial advisorYahoo FinanceWall St. opens at record highs on strong earningsReutersStart Earning Miles With The Best Travel CardWise BreadSponsoredMotorola's Moto Z2 Force is a smartphone guaranteed not to shatterYahoo FinanceConservative media outlets are sending Trump a big warning on Jeff Sessions — and Trump is paying attentionBusiness InsiderEconomists answer, are we at full employment?Yahoo Finance VideoCompare the Best Savings Accounts (2017)SmartAssetSponsoredStocks rise as the earnings parade marches on and investors wait for the FedYahoo FinanceFix My Finances: I borrowed from my 401(k)Yahoo FinanceJustice Dept. rules intensify crackdown on sanctuary citiesRick: If you're illegal and a criminal, you have to go!Join the Conversation1 / 51.6k















 






Martin Investment Management - Investment Advisor - Evanston, Illinois







 








 






  yzqxxefuzzvsyt






					Financial Advisors				

					Online Brokers				



				More 





 Search






							Investment Advisors							×














 
















Menu


See All Investment Advisors
OverviewFirm RegistrationAssets and AccountsClient TypesActivities and FeesEmployeesDisclosuresContact 








					Martin Investment Management, LLC				


OverviewFirm RegistrationAssets and AccountsMoreClient TypesActivities and FeesEmployeesDisclosuresContact 








Martin Investment Management, LLC



Overview




Firm Registration




Assets and Accounts




Client Types




Activities and Fees




Employees




Disclosures




Contact




References










 See all Investment Advisors				

 Guide				




Share



















Martin Investment Management Evanston, Illinois

 






total assets under management$835M United States Dollarstotal number of employees11total number of accounts175average account balance$4,769,072 United States Dollars 

 

Claim This Listing 5-Star Rated Advisors 












Advertisement


ShareOverviewMartin Investment Management, LLC is a registered investment advisory firm located in Evanston, Illinois. The firm manages 175 accounts totaling an estimated $834,587,649 USD in assets under management. Its operations include 11 employees and is categorized as providing investment advisory services to 175 clients. Many more details can be found below. You can also click here to see a list of all 29 investment advisors located in Evanston, Illinois.
Firm data current as of May 15, 2017

 





Advertisement


ShareFirm RegistrationRegistration Details

Firm CRD #:105381Primary Business Name:Martin Investment Management, LLC


Organization Type:Limited Liability Company


Regulator:SEC
Looking for a specific type of Investment Advisor? Check out the Investment Advisors homepage where you can apply custom filters to search through our database of 38,476 Registered Investment Advisors. For example, click the button below to view all advisors in Illinois, or set the filter for a specific city.See all Investment Advisors  in Illinois  >>State Registrations MapDates and StatusMoreState Registrations Map



Dates and Status

State RegulatorRegistration DateStatusIDUnique IdAlabamaDecember 10, 2012Notice FiledCaliforniaJune 17, 2003Notice FiledFloridaDecember 11, 2012Notice FiledIllinoisFebruary 2, 1989Notice FiledMassachusettsMarch 30, 2015Notice FiledNorth DakotaDecember 15, 2014Notice FiledNew YorkMarch 30, 2017Notice FiledTexasMarch 29, 2011Notice FiledWisconsinOctober 18, 1988Notice Filed

 





Advertisement


ShareAssets and AccountsCurrent Assets & AccountsAssets under management (AUM) is the primary metric used to compare one investment advisory firm to another. With an impressive $834,587,649 USD in AUM, Martin Investment Management is still considered a medium size firm, with assets below the esteemed one billion level. Click here to view a list of other similar-sized firms with AUM above $500 Million.discretionary assets under management$834,587,649 United States Dollarsnon-discretionary assets under management$0 United States Dollarstotal assets under management$835M United States Dollarsdiscretionary accounts175non-discretionary accounts0total number of accounts175Visit the Investment Advisors homepage to sort and filter firms based on assets under management >>Historical Assets & Accounts

Historical data is made available by the United States Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and is posted monthly on the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) section of the SEC's website. The following graphs illustrate the 89 months of historical data available for this firm.

Total AUMBreakdownMoreTotal AUM

SEC Report DateTotal Assets Under Management (AUM)IDFirm CRD #May 1, 2017$835M United States DollarsApril 3, 2017$835M United States DollarsOctober 1, 2015$821M United States DollarsNovember 2, 2015$821M United States DollarsDecember 1, 2015$821M United States DollarsJanuary 4, 2016$821M United States DollarsFebruary 1, 2016$821M United States DollarsMarch 1, 2016$821M United States DollarsJune 1, 2016$773M United States DollarsApril 1, 2016$773M United States DollarsMay 2, 2016$773M United States DollarsJuly 1, 2016$773M United States DollarsAugust 1, 2016$773M United States DollarsSeptember 1, 2016$773M United States DollarsOctober 3, 2016$773M United States Dollars

Breakdown

SEC Report DateDiscretionary AUMNon-discretionary AUMIDFirm CRD #May 1, 2017$835M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsApril 3, 2017$835M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsOctober 1, 2015$821M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsNovember 2, 2015$821M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsDecember 1, 2015$821M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsJanuary 4, 2016$821M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsFebruary 1, 2016$821M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsMarch 1, 2016$821M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsJune 1, 2016$773M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsApril 1, 2016$773M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsMay 2, 2016$773M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsJuly 1, 2016$773M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsAugust 1, 2016$773M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsSeptember 1, 2016$773M United States Dollars$0 United States DollarsOctober 3, 2016$773M United States Dollars$0 United States Dollars

AccountsBreakdownMoreAccounts

SEC Report DateTotal Number of AccountsIDFirm CRD #April 1, 2015214July 1, 2015214August 3, 2015214September 1, 2015214June 1, 2015214May 1, 2015214October 1, 2015198November 2, 2015198December 1, 2015198January 4, 2016198February 1, 2016198March 1, 2016198May 1, 2014195October 1, 2014195June 2, 2014195

Breakdown

SEC Report DateDiscretionary AccountsNon-discretionary AccountsIDFirm CRD #April 1, 20152140July 1, 20152140August 3, 20152140September 1, 20152140June 1, 20152140May 1, 20152140October 1, 20151980November 2, 20151980December 1, 20151980January 4, 20161980February 1, 20161980March 1, 20161980May 1, 20141950October 1, 20141950June 2, 20141950

 

 


Credio is a finance site that uses Graphiq’s semantic technology to deliver deep insights via data-driven articles, visualizations and research tools.


										Deep insights from finance data. Knowledge delivered. ›
									









ShareClient TypesTypes of Clients Served



IndividualsHigh Net Worth IndividualsPooled Investment VehiclesPension and Profit Sharing PlansCharitiesCorporations or Other BusinessesState or Municipal EntitiesOther Investment AdvisorsFirm CRD #IDIA Firm Name38 percent38 percent5.5 percent18 percent5.5 percent5.5 percent5.5 percent38 percent105381







Assets Attributed to Each Client Type

IndividualsHigh Net Worth IndividualsPooled Investment VehiclesPension and Profit Sharing PlansCharitiesCorporations or Other BusinessesState or Municipal EntitiesOther Investment AdvisorsCompany NameIDIA Firm Name13 percent13 percent13 percent88 percent13 percent13 percent88 percent88 percentMartin Investment Management


The SEC Form ADV organizes client types into 13 categories. Martin Investment Management reports working with 8 of these 13 client types. The firm reports serving a total of 175 clients and does not have any financial planning clients.If you're looking for a particular type of Advisor, you can click the button below and use the filters to select a list a Investment Advisors based on types of clients served.Select Investment Advisors by  types of clients  >> 





Advertisement


ShareActivities and FeesAreas of BusinessAdvisory Activities and Services:Individuals or Small BusinessesPortfolio Management for Businesses or Institutional ClientsSelection of Other AdvisorsWrap Fee ProgramSecurity PortfoliosOther Advisory Services: NoCompensationAdvisory Fees:Percentage of assetsHourly chargesFixed feesPerformance-based feesOther Fee Types: NoClick here to select Investment Advisors based on types of fees charged >> 

 







ShareEmployeesBy Categorytotal number of employees11investment adviser representatives2licensed insurance agents0broker-dealer registered reps0Representatives at Martin Investment Management

NameYears LicensedFinancial Exams PassedTotal DisclosuresIDMary Ellen Zellerbachyzqxxefuzzvsyt14 yearsSeries 65 - (NASAA)0Patrick Martin0


The largest firm in our database has 39,343 employees. Other firms report having no employees at all. On the Investment Advisors homepage you can sort and filter firms by number of employees, or select other advanced criteria.Select Investment Advisors by  number of employees  >> 





Advertisement


ShareDisclosuresPublic Disclosure Statements as Reported on Form ADVThe SEC keeps track of disclosures for the 24 categories listed below. With zero reported disclosures, Martin Investment Management has a perfect record. On the research topic home page you can view a pre-sorted list of all investment advisory firms with zero disclosures.Regulatory Criminal False Statements or Omissions to SEC or CFTCNoneFelony ChargesNoneSEC or CFTC ViolationsNoneFelony ConvictionsNoneBusiness Suspensions, Restrictions, or RevocationsNoneMisdemeanor ChargesNoneSEC or CFTC Entered an Order Against AdvisorNoneMisdemeanor ConvictionsNoneCivil Money Penalty or Cease and Desist OrdersNone  False Statements or Omissions to Other RegulatorNoneCivil Violations of Regulations or StatutesNoneEnjoinments with Domestic or Foreign CourtsNoneRestrictions or Denials of BusinessNoneViolations of Investment-Related StatutesNoneRegulator Entered Orders Against AdvisorNoneCivil Action Dismissed by a Settlement AgreementNoneDenials or Suspensions of RegistrationNoneSubject to Any Civil ProceedingNoneFalse Statements or Omissions to Self-Reg. OrgNone  Violation of Regulatory RulesNoneOther Associated with Any Business SuspensionsNoneAny Professional Authorization RevokedNoneMembership Suspensions or ExpulsionsNoneSubject to Any Regulatory ProceedingNone


View a complete list of all Investment Advisory Firms in our database >> ShareContact InfoPrincipal Office

Main Office Phone
(847) 424-9124


Main Office Fax
847-424-9182


Main Office Address
1560 Sherman Ave.Suite 1250Evanston,  Illinois 60201-5981United States


Location
Evanston


Website
martin-investments.com 
Still searching for the right advisor? Try the Investment Advisors homepage, where you can sort and filter 40,118 Registered Investment Advisors by fee type, advisory services, location and more. You can click the button below to view all Advisors in Evanston, or set the filter for more advanced specific criteria.See all Investment Advisors  in Evanston  >>  


×






References




Sources: SEC and FINRA. Show details  Hide details  







Was this page helpful?

Yes
No


 

BlkHol Emailyzqxxefuzzvsyt


Welcome to 
Hi! We see you would like to submit a rating. Please login or create an account to do so. Thank you!


Sign In With




Login with Google




Login with Facebook
 We'll never post without your permission.



Don't have an account?
Sign Up Now




Privacy
Terms & Conditions









						© 2017 Graphiq Inc. All Rights Reserved.
						
Support
Terms
Privacy
Ad Choices and Cookie Policy










 
 




 




Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









Investment Management  | BNY Mellon Wealth Management



    Investment Management Exceptional Capabilities; Talented Investment Professionals  Share this page 


   
   Investment Management Spanning all asset classes, our investment approach applies thoughtful market insights to deliver enhanced after-tax, total portfolio returns while minimizing risk. We leverage the vast resources of BNY Mellon's institutional investment organization to provide you unparalleled access to one of the world's largest and best recognized asset managers in a way that best suits your investment needs. 

While our investment capabilities are exceptional, they gain even greater strength when strategically combined within a portfolio. Our strategic asset allocation expertise, overall approach to investment architecture and thoughtful, objective-driven management help to ensure you receive the investment advice and solutions that best serve your goals.     Want to learn more?  Contact us today and we will connect you with an advisor who can tell you more about our Investment Management expertise.  Contact Us      Solutions  Asset AllocationStrategic ArchitectureObjective-Driven InvestingLiquidity ManagementMulti-Asset-Class Strategies Across Global Boutiques    
      Contact Us Want to know more?  Put our expertise to work on your behalf. Submit our short Contact Us form and we'll get in touch with you.       Contact Us 
 












Contact Us | BNY Mellon Wealth Management





      Contact      Get in touch with one of our professionals.   







 





Your Info
Summary





















Wealth Management Inquiries




General Inquiries
To speak with a wealth management professional, call 866-804-5023. 

Client Access or Support
For help accessing Private Workbench, call 866-829-4073. 

Check Verifications
For banking inquiries, call 866-636-0540. 



Office Locations
BNY Mellon Wealth Management works with individuals, families and institutions wherever they are located. View our list of office locations. 
















Other Inquiries





Careers at BNY Mellon


View Job Opportunities



Employee Directory


Contact an Employee



Check Verifications










Family Office Investment Solutions


View Our Capabilities







Planned Giving Programs


View Our Capabilities



Endowments & Foundations


View Our Capabilities








  












Discover  | BNY Mellon Wealth Management



        Discover How we successfully manage wealth and the types of clients we serve.     
      Who We Serve      Customized plans and services for individuals, families, advisors and institutions   



Individuals & Families
We specialize in meeting the complex investment and banking needs of wealthy individuals and their families.
Learn More



Advisors to Individuals & Families
We offer a collaborative approach and customized solutions for our clients' other professional and financial advisors.
Learn More



Family Offices
Among the first of its kind in the nation, our Family Office services feature industry-leading resources and expertise for family offices and their financial interests.
Learn More



Non-Profits
We offer a full range of investment, custody, and reporting services tailored specifically to the needs of non-profits nationwide.
Learn More



      Capabilities      Deep expertise across a wide range of wealth management services           Asset Servicing & Information Management       Asset Servicing & Information Management  As the world’s largest asset servicing provider, we make sure that your assets and information are secure through our full range of custody, administration, and reporting services.  Learn more         Credit & Lending Services       Credit & Lending Services  As the oldest U.S. private bank, we have extensive experience in credit and lending–and in the strategies that make them effective components of your wealth plan.  Learn more         Donor Advised Funds       Donor Advised Funds  We have a distinct team dedicated to the needs of donor advised fund sponsor organizations and individual donors.  Learn more         Endowment & Foundation Services       Endowment & Foundation Services  We have an experienced team dedicated exclusively to the needs of Endowments and Foundations.  Learn more         Escrow Services       Escrow Services  Escrow arrangements offer a perfect solution when you and another party require property such as cash, securities, real estate or insurance policies, to be held by a third party until certain conditions are met.  Learn more         Family Office Investment Solutions       Family Office Investment Solutions  The Family Office investment platform focuses on delivery of custom solutions constructed around each client’s unique liquidity, cash flow, tax, risk and return requirements.  Learn more         Fiduciary Services       Fiduciary Services  One of the largest banks in the world and the creator of the nation’s first trust, we are unrivaled in fiduciary experience.  Learn more         Investment Management       Investment Management  Our investment management services are dedicated exclusively to the needs of private clients.  Learn more         Jumbo Mortgages       Jumbo Mortgages  As a jumbo mortgage lender of primary and vacation homes nationwide, we have unrivaled expertise in creating and managing solutions to meet the needs of our private clients.  Learn more         Philanthropy       Philanthropy  With BNY Mellon, your charitable gifts not only serve recipients well, but also remained aligned with your strategic, philanthropic and financial goals.  Learn more         Planned Giving Services       Planned Giving Services  For more than 20 years, we have served non-profit organizations with comprehensive gift management services, tailored investment management solutions, and donor and organizational support.  Learn more         Private Banking       Private Banking  From checking, savings and online banking to sophisticated financing strategies, we respond to the evolving needs of our clients with customized solutions and personalized service.  Learn more         Self-Directed Investment Services       Self-Directed Investment Services  Our Cash Management Access Account (CMAA) combines our banking capabilities with our brokerage services in one streamlined solution.   Learn more         Wealth & Estate Planning       Wealth & Estate Planning  When you’ve been serving wealthy clients for more than two centuries, there are few wealth challenges you haven’t seen – or solved.   Learn more       
      Contact Us Want to know more about BNY Mellon Wealth Management?  Fill in the quick contact form and we’ll connect you with the right person to discuss your needs.      Contact Us 
 












Experience | BNY Mellon Wealth Management



     My Experience  I am a  choose one                  I am a    Individual InvestorAdvisor to an IndividualFamily OfficeNon-Profit             and  I'm looking for guidance because            choose one                   I'm looking for guidance because...                   * Please select a    See Results                      Experience A Client-First Culture We do things a little differently at BNY Mellon Wealth Management. Here, we have a commitment to serving clients, not selling products–a client-first approach that has led to industry-leading client satisfaction rates. 

And while we're proud of those results, it’s our client retention rates that matter most to us. Those sustained relationships can only be earned over time–and they’re what allow us to create not just richer lifetimes, but enduring legacies.     
      Becoming an Individual Client      Personal strategies and services based on one question: What do you need?        Experience The Individual Investor Journey At BNY Mellon Wealth Management, expect to receive the best of both worlds: the high-touch, one-on-one service of an investment boutique backed by the power of a large, resource-rich global firm. 

Industry-leading client service. Best in class resources. A spirit of innovation. All focused on you. 

Want to learn more about solutions for Individual Investors? Contact us today, and we’ll connect you with a professional who can help you build a wealth plan specific to your needs. 
              1Discuss2Assess3Plan4Implement5Manage       The Individual Investor Journey Step 1 Discuss Your Goals Working closely, we define your ultimate objectives and expectations for lifestyle and wealth transfer. This ensures everyone is aligned around your collective vision from the start.       The Individual Investor Journey Step 2 Assess Your Portfolio Guided by your goals and risk tolerance, we explore the mix of asset classes that’s right for you. We identify each entity's optimal contribution and consider strategic alignment with your chosen goals.        The Individual Investor Journey Step 3 Plan For What's Next We analyze each entity within your portfolio, including IRAs, trusts and credit facilities, as well as special situations such as business interests or executive compensation. Our plan is created with your input throughout, and moves to implementation only with your approval.       The Individual Investor Journey Step 4 Implement Strategic Action We document your plan's details and review with you, aligning them with your requirements before implementing the strategy.       The Individual Investor Journey Step 5 Actively Manage Unlike other firms, your portfolio is managed actively by a team of people. They are regularly revisiting your goals, rebalancing your positions, and identifying new opportunities. They have your interests top of mind, all the time.        Discover Our Services for Individuals & Families  Learn More 
      Becoming an Institutional Client      We understand what makes institutional wealth management unique. And we know how to optimize it.            Experience The Institutional Investor Journey No single firm offers family offices and non-profits integrated support like BNY Mellon Wealth Management. Industry-leading custody capabilities and deep fiduciary knowledge make our in-house expertise for institutions unparalleled. And our centuries of investment excellence across asset classes and styles informs everything we do.


Want to learn more about our solutions for Institutions? Get the answers you need to discover what BNY Mellon Wealth Management can do for your organization.          1Discuss2Assess3Plan4Implement5Manage       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 1 Discuss Your Goals Even before you’ve committed to being a client, you will meet your core team of advisors. Together, you will outline your organization’s needs and goals.       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 2 Assess Your Portfolio With your organization’s goals in mind, the team will work look closely at what currently exists. This work is aimed at uncovering under-leveraged assets, missed opportunities and unnecessary risks relative to your organization’s future needs.       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 3 Plan For What's Next Your dedicated client services team works with you to outline near-term and long-term strategic goals. Timeframes and milestones are established along with the communication plan.       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 4 Implement Strategic Action The team goes to work executing the agreed upon strategy, keeping you informed every step of the way. Reports are made available for you to review and share.       The Institutional Investor Journey Step 5 Actively Manage Your team is regularly revisiting your organization’s goals and actively identifying new opportunities or risks. We are also constantly consulting with our internal experts, sharing best thinking and getting ahead of trends.        Discover Our Services for Institutions  Learn More 
      Private Workbench      Take a tour of our online platform for real-time account information, research and reports        Private Workbench Benefits    Mobile Access Available on your phone, tablet, or laptop, so you can monitor your investments and banking in real time.   Custom Settings Make the experience yours by seeing only what you want and nothing that you don’t.   Direct Access to Your Dedicated Team The My Team tab gives you direct email access to your wealth management team.     
      Contact Us How can we help you?  Your questions are important to us, complete our contact form and we’ll connect you with the right team member to discuss your needs.      Contact Us 
 
























Institutional home



















































Vanguard - DC Small/Mid Services: Our approach                                     
        



























































Your input was invalid





























Defined ContributionSmall/Mid plans (startup to $20M+)








 Our approach 
 Sponsor support 
 Participant experience 
 Plan administration 
 Advisor and TPA support 
 Plan Advisor Resource Center








Select Our approachAll  

Sponsor supportAll  

Participant experienceAll  

Plan administrationAll  

Advisor and TPA supportAll  

Plan Advisor Resource CenterAll  










Our approach

Leaders of small and mid-sized businesses have multiple roles and competing priorities. You want a best-in-class retirement plan but may be unsure about all the complexities and requirements. You may be uncertain about the costs and fees involved. You need a provider focused solely on retirement and aligned with your needs and goals—and fully committed to you, your participants, and the ongoing improvement of retirement investing.

Vanguard is committed to the retirement business and is a leader in the retirement plan industry. Best of all, you can benefit from Vanguard's unique ownership structure: We're owned by our clients and not by outside investors or stockholders. That means you never need to question whose interests come first for us. This approach serves as a foundation for all that we do with Vanguard Retirement Plan Access™, our 401(k) offer for small and mid-sized plans. You can count on our expertise to remove the uncertainties from managing your plan and our leadership to help you offer a strong plan for your participants. 



Key benefits




You can:

Have confidence in your plan.
Understand your costs.
Focus on your business.





Cost-conscious?
As a business owner and plan fiduciary, you want to eliminate ambiguity in retirement plan costs. Research has shown that plan costs for the smaller end of the market tend to be higher, and you need a retirement plan provider that not only provides transparent pricing but has a fair and reasonable cost structure.1
With Vanguard Retirement Plan Access:

You receive an All-in Fee Report that shows the total cost of your plan.
You have access to low-cost Vanguard index funds, plus the opportunity to choose from among more than 12,000 non-Vanguard funds.
Your annual recordkeeping price is based on a per-participant fee—a fee that doesn't jump as your assets grow, as with many small to mid-sized retirement plans.
You have flexibility in how you cover your plan costs—including a recordkeeping credit depending on the share class selected.




Too busy?
 As a business owner, you're pressed for time and focused on many aspects of business. With Vanguard Retirement Plan Access, you can rely on high-quality recordkeeping and administration to ease your administrative burden and help your employees stay on track for retirement.


1 Source: Investment Company Institute, 2014. 

















Contact us
  888-684-401K
  Email






Plan Advisor Resource Center



Working with your partners
 We can work with your advisor and third-party administrator to create a state-of-the-art plan.

Request information (RFI)Vanguard Retirement Plan Access™
Vanguard: Taking a stand for your participants
Infographic: Small biz saves smart
















Plan Advisor Resource Center



Working with your partners
            We can work with your advisor and third-party administrator to create a state-of-the-art plan.


Request information (RFI)Vanguard Retirement Plan Access™
Vanguard: Taking a stand for your participants
Infographic: Small biz saves smart































































Vanguard - Nonprofit services: Advisory services                                     
        



























































Your input was invalid





























Nonprofit








 Understanding your needs 
 Advisory services 
 Your Vanguard team 
 Nonprofit resource center








Select Understanding your needsAll  

Advisory servicesAll  

Your Vanguard teamAll  

Nonprofit resource centerAll  










Advisory services
Many organizations like yours find it challenging to oversee their portfolio while also managing the day-to-day responsibilities of running their endowment, foundation, or charitable organization. But partnering with a provider who understands your needs can help you better balance these competing priorities.
Partnering with your organization
Vanguard Institutional Advisory Services® (VIAS) offers nonprofits the considerable resources of a large investment firm like Vanguard with the customized service of a specialized boutique. When your organization partners with VIAS, you work with a team of investment professionals that has your objectives and fiduciary responsibilities in mind. VIAS strives to:

Understand your organization's mission, spending needs, and unique situation and offer sophisticated, unbiased advice.
Develop a low-cost portfolio customized to your organization's needs.
Relieve your staff of many of the day-to-day burdens of investment program management.

OCIO: One service, many names


One approach nonprofits are increasingly considering is an outsourced chief investment officer (OCIO). An OCIO service—which is a key offering of Vanguard Institutional Advisory Services—acts as an extension of the board and investment staff. The OCIO determines an asset allocation strategy, selects investment advisors to implement it, and manages its operation and execution. Investment providers and clients call this service a variety of names, including discretionary management, advisory services, and investment management.





Investing and advising
Optimizing your portfolio to meet your long-term investment objectives requires time and skill. VIAS helps you develop a tailored portfolio that ensures your investments are diversified, risk-appropriate, and aligned with your overall strategy.
Our comprehensive advisory services include:









Portfolio construction 

Asset allocation analysis that uses a distinct, proprietary model to deliver solutions based on your portfolio needs.
Investment policy consulting designed to meet the unique investment goals of your organization.
Customized product selection that focuses on low-cost index and active investments.











Portfolio management

Performance reporting to help keep your investment committee informed.
Investment reviews that provide insights into your portfolio and the broader market and economic environment.
Steadfast commitment to risk management and process excellence through ongoing portfolio monitoring and rebalancing.








Research & expertise

Investment expertise and commentary on financial issues that provide context for your decision-making.
Investment committee best practices that are designed to increase your group's effectiveness.





Notes:

Advice services offered through Vanguard Institutional Advisory Services are provided by Vanguard Advisers, Inc., a registered investment advisor.
All investments are subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest. 
Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss in a declining market. 

















Contact us
  888-888-7064
  Email







Nonprofit Resource Center

Fiduciary roles & lawsMission & planningInvestment strategy
Governance best practices
Fiduciary toolkit

LEARN HOW WE SUPPORT
Defined contribution plans

Defined benefit plans

Consultants
Request information (RFI) 











Contact us
  888-888-7064
  E-mail







Nonprofit Resource Center

Fiduciary roles & lawsMission & planningInvestment strategy
Governance best practices
Fiduciary toolkit

LEARN HOW WE SUPPORT
Defined contribution plans

Defined benefit plans

Consultants
Request information (RFI) 






























































Vanguard - Target-date strategies                                     
        


























































Your input was invalid






























Enduring. Holistic.Defendable. Vanguard Target Retirement Funds










 



Not all target-date funds are created equal.™ 






Our infographic can help you evaluate your target-date fund (TDF) strategy. It includes three steps that focus on TDF costs, stability, and investor focus.                                 Learn more.






















Target-date strategies
Selecting a target-date fund (TDF) series for your qualified default investment alternative can be a critical step in designing a defined contribution (DC) retirement plan that can stand up to the scrutiny from many quarters, including regulators.

Vanguard Target Retirement Funds offer a sophisticated design and a clear, straightforward glide path that's a natural fit for autoenrollment and default investment programs—a TDF strategy that can help lower your fiduciary risk and help improve the odds of your plan participants achieving their retirement goals.



Fiduciaries value not only the sophisticated methodology behind the Vanguard Target Retirement portfolio, but also the clarity of the glide path, index implementation, and high degree of transparency.
John Croke
Target Retirement Fund Product Manager










Enduring investment solution
With Vanguard, you'll have a target-date retirement solution that is implemented with a well-diversified set of market-cap-weighted index funds. The embedded diversification of this approach provides balance against the markets‘ natural ups and downs.





Reaching goals through a holistic approach
Vanguard's target-date funds are designed by investment, plan design, and participant behavior experts. This integrated approach puts participants at the heart of your target-date offering so you can have confidence that your target-date offering can help your participants reach their retirement goals.





Defendable performance year after year
The combination of consistent, prudent product oversight and our history of reducing costs help you deliver defensible performance to investment committees and plan participants year after year.


Sophisticated portfolio construction
The Target Retirement Funds are designed by Vanguard's respected investment managers and asset allocation experts and are grounded in ongoing, cross-disciplinary research. The glide path reflects a long-term, holistic view of retirement investing.



MORE ABOUT TARGET-DATE STRATEGIES
Research & commentary

* Vanguard Target Retirement Funds offer the simplicity of an index-oriented, well-diversified portfolio that is strategic and straightforward in its approach. The funds are composed of five underlying index funds and follow an easy-to-understand asset allocation glide path. Underlying this simplicity is Vanguard's deep investment expertise, knowledge of the capital markets, and insights into participant behavior.
Investments in Target Retirement Funds are subject to the risks of their underlying funds. The year in the fund name refers to the approximate year (the target date) when an investor in the fund would retire and leave the workforce. The fund will gradually shift its emphasis from more aggressive investments (stocks) to more conservative ones (bonds and short-term reserves) based on its
                   target date. An investment in a Target Retirement Fund is not guaranteed at any time, including on or after the target date.
              
All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest.
Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss.
There is no guarantee that any particular asset allocation or mix of funds will meet your investment objectives or provide you with a given level of income.
















Contact us


  800-523-1036

OUR TARGET-DATE LINEUP
Vanguard Target Retirement Funds

































